Louisiana, session 2026, HB329.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 23:1017.1(6) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1017.1. Definitions
Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the following words and
terms, when used in this Part, shall have the following meanings:
* * *
(6) "First responder" means a volunteer engaged in activities involving the
Governor's Office of Homeland Security and Emergency Preparedness pursuant to
R.S. 29:721 et seq., and first responders as defined in R.S. 29:723 including but not
limited to medical personnel, emergency and medical technicians, volunteer firemen,
auxiliary law enforcement officers, state agency essential workers, emergency
service dispatchers, emergency response operators, electrical linemen and members
of the United Cajun Navy as defined by R.S. 29:723, and members of the Civil Air
Patrol.
* * *
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-616 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 329
Section 2. R.S. 29:739(C) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 29:723(21) is
hereby enacted to read as follows:
§723. Definitions
As used in this Chapter:
* * *
(21) "The United Cajun Navy" means the nonprofit organization registered
with the secretary of state by charter number 43009455N.
* * *
§739. Intrastate Mutual Aid Compact
* * *
C. Definitions
As used in this Section, "first responder" refers to those individuals who in
the early stages of an incident are responsible for the protection and preservation of
life, property, evidence, and the environment, including emergency response
providers as defined in Section 2 of the Homeland Security Act of 2002, 6 U.S.C.
101, as well as emergency management, public health, clinical care, public works,
and other skilled support personnel, such as equipment operators, and electrical
linemen, and members of the United Cajun Navy that provide immediate support
services during prevention, response, and recovery operations consistent with
Homeland Security Presidential Directive 8.
* * *